New York, session 2025-2026, A7312.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subject to the provisions of this act but notwithstanding 2 any other provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner of general 3 services is hereby authorized to transfer and convey to the Veterans and 4 Community Housing Coalition, in consideration of one dollar and upon 5 such other conditions as the commissioner may deem proper, the lands as 6 identified in section two of this act. 7 § 2. The lands authorized by section one of this act to be transferred 8 and conveyed are as follows: 9 ALL that piece or parcel of land situate, lying, and being in the town 10 of Wilton, county of Saratoga, state of New York, more particularly 11 bounded and described as follows: 12 BEGINNING at a point on the easterly boundary of Northern Pines Road 13 (County Route No. 34) at the southwest corner of lands conveyed to the 14 county of Saratoga by The People of State of New York by deed dated 15 January 18, 2008 and recorded in the Saratoga County Clerk's Office in 16 Instrument No. 2008003271, said point being S 7° 22' 34" E a distance of 17 260.00 feet from the southerly boundary of Camp Saratoga Road; thence 18 from said point of beginning along the southerly, westerly and southerly 19 boundary of said lands conveyed to the county of Saratoga the following 20 five (5) courses and distances: 21 1. S 83° 01' 10" E a distance of 310.67 feet to a point; 22 2. S 12° 14' 08" E a distance of 145.00 feet to a point; 23 3. S 41° 39' 29" W a distance of 198.00 feet to a point; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11150-01-5 A. 7312 2 1 4. S 39° 21' 53" E a distance of 129.68 feet to a point; and 2 5. N 82° 59' 41" E a distance of 224.94 feet to a point 3 at the southeast corner of said lands conveyed to the county of Sara- 4 toga; thence continuing through lands of The People of the State of New 5 York N 82° 59' 41" E a distance of 591 feet, more or less, to a point; 6 thence S 7° 00' 19" E to a point on the southerly boundary of lands of 7 The People of the State of New York; thence westerly to the easterly 8 boundary of Northern Pines Road (County Route No. 34); thence northerly 9 along the easterly boundary of Northern Pines Road (County Route No. 34) 10 to the point or place of beginning. Containing 15 acres of land, more or 11 less. 12 § 3. The description in section two of this act of the land to be 13 conveyed is not intended to be a legal description but is intended to 14 identify the parcel to be conveyed. As a condition of the transfer, the 15 Veterans and Community Housing Coalition shall submit to the commission- 16 er of general services, for their approval: (i) an accurate survey and 17 description of the lands to be conveyed, which may be used in the 18 conveyance thereof; and (ii) a site plan showing the proposed improve- 19 ments necessary to carry out the public purposes set forth in section 20 five of this act. 21 § 4. The office of general services shall not transfer or convey the 22 land described in section two of this act unless an application is made 23 to the office of general services by the Veterans and Community Housing 24 Coalition within two years after the effective date of this act. The 25 transfer or conveyance of such land shall be completed within one year 26 after the Veterans and Community Housing Coalition submits the applica- 27 tion to the office of general services. 28 § 5. Any lands transferred pursuant to this act shall be used and 29 improved solely for the provision of housing and supportive services for 30 public benefit, including but not limited to providing housing and 31 services to homeless and at-risk veterans. Upon termination of such use, 32 title to the lands so transferred shall revert to the state of New York. 33 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 34 deemed repealed three years after such date.